Hawaii statutes.
[§167-16] Consideration of petitions;
notice and hearing. When more than one petition is filed covering portions
of the same territory, the board of agriculture may consolidate the petitions.
Having received the petitions, on the basis of such evidence as may be
submitted to it by the petitioners and on the findings of investigations or
surveys made by or for it, or by other governmental agencies, the board shall
establish such irrigation projects as it deems necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter. Before making a final determination to establish a
project or projects, the board shall hold a hearing, notice of which shall be
duly advertised in the same manner and form, as nearly as may be, as provided
in section 167-17. [L 1987, c 306, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next